Florida, session 2026, SB794.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 393.0655, Florida 30 Statutes, is amended to read: 31 393.0655âScreening of direct service providers.â 32 (1)âMINIMUM STANDARDS.âThe agency shall require level 2 33 employment screening pursuant to chapter 435 for direct service 34 providers who are unrelated to their clients, including support 35 coordinators, and all employees managers and supervisors of 36 residential facilities or adult day training programs licensed 37 under this chapter and any other persons, including volunteers, 38 who provide care or services, who have access to a clientâs 39 living areas, or who have access to a clientâs funds or personal 40 property. Background screening for all employees must include 41 employment history checks as provided in s. 435.03(1) and local 42 criminal records checks through local law enforcement agencies. 43 (a)âA volunteer who assists on an intermittent basis for 44 less than 10 hours per month does not have to be screened if a 45 person who meets the screening requirement of this section is 46 always present and has the volunteer within his or her line of 47 sight. 48 (b)âLicensed physicians, nurses, or other professionals 49 licensed and regulated by the Department of Health are not 50 subject to background screening pursuant to this section if they 51 are providing a service that is within their scope of licensed 52 practice. 53 (c)âA person selected by the family or the individual with 54 developmental disabilities and paid by the family or the 55 individual to provide supports or services is not required to 56 have a background screening under this section. 57 (d)âPersons 12 years of age or older, including family 58 members, residing with a direct services provider who provides 59 services to clients in his or her own place of residence are 60 subject to background screening; however, such persons who are 61 12 to 18 years of age shall be screened for delinquency records 62 only. 63 Section 2.â(1)(a)âFor purposes of enhancing the quality, 64 capacity, and consistency of waiver support coordination 65 services, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities shall 66 contract with a state university to develop and administer 67 surveys regarding waiver support coordination services. The 68 university shall administer surveys to owners and operators of 69 all qualified organizations in this state; support coordinators 70 currently employed by a qualified organization; and iBudget 71 clients and their parents, caregivers, or legal guardians. 72 1.âThe surveys must, at a minimum, solicit data and input 73 regarding: 74 a.âThe quality, consistency, and accessibility of services 75 provided by support coordinators. 76 b.âAttributes and behaviors that define high-quality 77 support coordination. 78 c.âBest practices and areas for improvement. 79 d.âQuantitative and qualitative metrics suitable for 80 assessing support coordinator performance. 81 e.âAny other factors deemed pertinent by the university or 82 the agency to improve service delivery. 83 2.âSurveys of qualified organizations must also 84 specifically address: 85 a.âProfessional and educational prerequisites established 86 by the organization for employment as a support coordinator. 87 b.âMethods used to assess core competencies. 88 c.âThe efficacy of the mentoring program required under s. 89 393.0663(2)(b), Florida Statutes. 90 d.âOperational and systemic challenges with recruitment and 91 retention of qualified support coordinators. 92 3.âSurveys of individual waiver support coordinators must 93 also specifically address: 94 a.âIndividual caseload ratios, capacity, and geographic 95 service areas. 96 b.âThe efficacy of the mentoring program required under s. 97 393.0663(2)(b), Florida Statutes. 98 c.âOperational and systemic challenges to delivery of 99 effective support coordination. 100 4.âSurveys of iBudget clients and their parents, 101 caregivers, or legal guardians must also specifically address 102 satisfaction with support coordination services. 103 (b)âBy October 1, 2026, the state university shall submit a 104 final report to the agency, including a compilation and analysis 105 of the survey results. 106 (2)âThe agency shall solicit input on enhancing support 107 coordinator quality, capacity, and consistency from the whole 108 community of waiver program stakeholders, and shall conduct at 109 least one publicly noticed hearing for this purpose in each 110 service region. 111 (3)âThe agency shall conduct or contract for a gap analysis 112 to assess the geographic distribution and caseload capacity of 113 waiver support coordinators across this state. 114 (4)âUsing the information gathered under this section, the 115 agency shall identify specific core competencies for waiver 116 support coordinators, identify specific performance metrics to 117 assess those core competencies, and make recommendations on how 118 to standardize their assessment. By February 15, 2027, the 119 agency shall submit a report to the Governor, the President of 120 the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives on 121 its findings and recommendations, and include the full report 122 submitted by the state university under subsection (1). 123 (5)âThis section shall take effect upon this act becoming a 124 law. 125 Section 3.âPresent subsections (46) and (47) of section 126 393.063, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (47) 127 and (48), respectively, a new subsection (46) is added to that 128 section, and subsection (11) of that section is amended, to 129 read: 130 393.063âDefinitions.âFor the purposes of this chapter, the 131 term: 132 (11)ââDevelopmental disabilityâ means a disorder or 133 syndrome that is attributable to intellectual disability, 134 cerebral palsy, autism, spina bifida, Down syndrome, Phelan 135 McDermid syndrome, or Prader-Willi syndrome, or Tatton-Brown 136 Rahman syndrome; that manifests before the age of 18; and that 137 constitutes a substantial handicap that can reasonably be 138 expected to continue indefinitely. 139 (46)ââTatton-Brown-Rahman syndromeâ means a disorder caused 140 by a mutation in the DNMT3A gene typified by mild to severe 141 intellectual disability; macrocephaly; stature and weight that 142 are greater than or equal to two or more standard deviations 143 above the mean for the personâs age and sex; and any of the 144 following features presenting in infancy, childhood, or 145 adolescence: 146 (a)âMild facial dysmorphism. 147 (b)âJoint hypermobility. 148 (c)âHypotonia. 149 (d)âKyphoscoliosis. 150 (e)âSeizures. 151 (f)âCryptorchidism. 152 (g)âDeficits in behavior. 153 (h)âHematologic malignancies. 154 Section 4.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 155 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 156 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1, 157 2026.